Indiana, session 2026, HB1231.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 13-11-2-17.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17.3. (a) "Battery containing
product", for purposes of section 171.5 of this chapter and
IC 13-20.7, means a product that contains or is packaged with a
covered battery.
(b) The term does not include computers, small scale servers,
computer monitors, electronic keyboards and mice, printers, fax
machines, scanners, televisions, digital video disc players and
recorders, video cassette recorders, digital converter boxes, cable
receivers, satellite receivers, portable digital music players, and
video game consoles.
SECTION 2. IC 13-11-2-17.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17.5. "Battery stewardship
organization", for purposes of sections 31.7 and 180.3 of this
chapter and IC 13-20.7, means an organization designated by a
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


producer to implement a battery stewardship plan approved by the
department under IC 13-20.7.
SECTION 3. IC 13-11-2-31.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31.7. "Collection rate", for
purposes of IC 13-20.7, means the percentage calculated by
dividing:
(1) the total weight of covered batteries collected by a battery
stewardship organization in Indiana during a calendar year;
by
(2) the average annual weight of covered batteries estimated
to have been sold by all producers in Indiana during the
previous three (3) calendar years.
SECTION 4. IC 13-11-2-47.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 47.3. "Covered battery", for
purposes of this chapter and IC 13-20.7, means a portable battery
or a medium format battery.
SECTION 5. IC 13-11-2-128.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 128.1. "Medium format battery",
for purposes of section 47.3 of this chapter, means a:
(1) nonrechargeable battery that weighs more than four and
four-tenths (4.4) pounds but less than or equal to twenty-five
(25) pounds; or
(2) rechargeable battery that:
(A) weighs more than eleven (11) pounds or has a rating of
more than three hundred (300) watt hours; and
(B) weighs less than or equal to twenty-five (25) pounds
and has a rating of less than or equal to two thousand
(2,000) watt hours.
SECTION 6. IC 13-11-2-166.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 166.7. "Portable battery", for
purposes of section 47.3 of this chapter, means a:
(1) nonrechargeable battery that weighs less than or equal to
four and four-tenths (4.4) pounds; or
(2) rechargeable battery that weighs less than or equal to
eleven (11) pounds and has a rating of less than or equal to
three hundred (300) watt hours.
SECTION 7. IC 13-11-2-171.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 171.5. (a) "Producer", for
purposes of sections 17.5 and 31.7 of this chapter and IC 13-20.7,
means the following:
(1) For a covered battery, the following:
(A) If the battery is sold under the brand of the battery
manufacturer, the battery manufacturer.
(B) If the battery is sold under a retail brand or under a
brand owned by a person other than the manufacturer, the
brand owner.
(C) If clauses (A) and (B) are inapplicable, the licensee of
a brand or trademark under which the battery is:
(i) used in a commercial enterprise;
(ii) sold;
(iii) offered for sale; or
(iv) distributed.
(2) For a battery containing product, the following:
(A) If the battery containing product is sold under the
brand of the product manufacturer, the product
manufacturer.
(B) If the battery containing product is sold under a retail
brand or under a brand owned by a person other than the
manufacturer, the brand owner.
(C) If clauses (A) and (B) are inapplicable, the licensee of
a brand or trademark under which the product is:
(i) used in a commercial enterprise;
(ii) sold;
(iii) offered for sale; or
(iv) distributed.
(b) The term does not include a person who would otherwise be
considered a producer under subsection (a)(2) if:
(1) the supplier of the battery used in the product has joined
a registered battery stewardship organization with respect to
the battery; and
(2) the supplier provides written certification of its
membership in the approved battery stewardship
organization to the person who would otherwise be considered
a producer under subsection (a)(2).
SECTION 8. IC 13-11-2-178.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 178.3. "Rechargeable battery",
for purposes of sections 128.1 and 166.7 of this chapter, means a
battery that:
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


(1) contains one (1) or more voltaic or galvanic cells
electrically connected to produce electric energy; and
(2) is designed to be recharged.
SECTION 9. IC 13-11-2-180, AS AMENDED BY P.L.54-2023,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 180. (a) "Recycling", for purposes of
IC 13-20-17.5 and IC 13-21:
(1) means a process by which materials that would otherwise
become solid waste are:
(A) collected;
(B) separated or processed; and
(C) converted into materials or products for reuse or sale; and
(2) includes advanced recycling.
(b) "Recycling", for purposes of section 179.9 of this chapter and
IC 13-20.5, means the process of collecting and preparing video display
devices or covered electronic devices for use in manufacturing
processes or for recovery of useable materials followed by delivery of
the materials for use. The term does not include the following:
(1) Destruction of recyclable materials by incineration or another
process.
(2) Land disposal of recyclable materials.
(3) Reuse, repair, or any other process through which video
display devices or covered electronic devices are returned to use
for covered entities in their original form.
(c) "Recycling", for purposes of IC 13-20.7, means the process
of collecting and preparing a covered battery for:
(1) use in a manufacturing process; or
(2) the recovery and delivery of usable materials.
However, the term does not include the destruction of a covered
battery, land disposal of recyclable materials, or any process by
which a covered battery is returned to its original form such as a
repair.
SECTION 10. IC 13-11-2-180.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 180.3. "Recycling efficiency
rate", for purposes of IC 13-20.7, means the percentage calculated
by dividing:
(1) the weight of components and materials recycled by a
battery stewardship organization; by
(2) the weight of covered batteries collected by the battery
stewardship organization.
SECTION 11. IC 13-11-2-194, AS AMENDED BY P.L.176-2023,
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 194. (a) "Retailer", for purposes of IC 13-20-14,
means a person engaged in the business of selling new tires at retail in
Indiana.
(b) "Retailer", for purposes of IC 13-20-16, means a person engaged
in the business of selling lead acid batteries at retail in Indiana.
(c) "Retailer", for purposes of section 195.7 of this chapter and
IC 13-20.5, means a person that sells, rents, or leases, through sales
outlets, catalogs, or the Internet, a video display device to a covered
entity and not for resale in any form.
(d) "Retailer", for purposes of IC 13-20.7, means a person that:
(1) sells;
(2) offers for sale; or
(3) distributes;
a covered battery.
(d) (e) "Retailer", for purposes of section 0.4 of this chapter and
IC 13-23, means a person who purchases motor fuel for sale to the
general public for ultimate consumption.
SECTION 12. IC 13-20.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
ARTICLE 20.7. RECYCLING OF BATTERIES
Chapter 1. Applicability
Sec. 1. Except as provided in IC 13-20.7-5-2, this article does not
apply to:
(1) a covered battery regulated by IC 13-20-16, except that
this article does apply to a covered battery:
(A) that:
(i) contains lead and sulfuric acid; and
(ii) has nominal voltage of at least six (6) volts; and
(B) that is used in a motorized toy;
(2) a covered battery contained within a device, as defined in
21 U.S.C. 321(h), that is not designed and marketed for sale or
resale principally to consumers for personal use;
(3) a covered battery that is:
(A) in a product; and
(B) not designed to be easily removable from the product;
(4) a covered battery that contains an electrolyte as a free
liquid;
(5) a covered battery designed to power a motor vehicle, in
whole or part, or a component of a motor vehicle;
(6) a covered battery or battery containing product or that
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


has been recalled for safety reasons; or
(7) a covered battery that is a part of a utility scale battery
energy storage system (as defined in IC 22-14-8-3).
Chapter 2. Requirements
Sec. 1. Beginning January 1, 2030, a retailer may not sell, offer
for sale, or distribute for sale a covered battery or battery
containing product unless:
(1) the producer has joined a battery stewardship
organization; and
(2) the battery is approved under a battery stewardship plan
described in this article.
Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to a covered battery that:
(1) is greater than or equal to one-half (1/2) inch in diameter;
or
(2) contains a surface with a length that exceeds one-half (1/2)
inch.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), beginning January 1,
2030, a covered battery or battery in a battery containing product
must include the following on the battery:
(1) The identity of the producer.
(2) The chemistry of the battery.
(3) A disclaimer that the battery should not be disposed of as
ordinary waste.
(c) If a covered battery can fit entirely, in any orientation, into
the small parts cylinder described in 16 CFR 1501.4, the marks
described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(3) must be placed on the
packaging of the covered battery.
Chapter 3. Battery Stewardship Plans
Sec. 1. A battery stewardship organization shall submit to the
department a battery stewardship plan focused on improving the
quantity and effectiveness of recycling.
Sec. 2. A battery stewardship plan must include the following:
(1) A list of each:
(A) producer; and
(B) brand of covered battery;
intended to be covered by the battery stewardship plan.
(2) A list of each collection site intended to be used as part of
the battery stewardship plan.
(3) A performance plan that includes:
(A) collection rate goals;
(B) recycling efficiency rate goals; and
(C) education and safety standards, including collection
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


site safety training procedures related to covered battery
collection activities at collection sites, such as appropriate
protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires and response
protocols in the event of a spill or fire, and a protocol for
safe management of damaged batteries that are returned
to collection sites;
with respect to covered batteries intended to be covered by
the battery stewardship plan.
(4) A financial plan that fully funds compliance with this
article without shifting costs to consumers and that
reimburses units of local government for collecting covered
batteries.
(5) Any other information required by the department.
Sec. 3. The department shall approve or deny a battery
stewardship plan not later than one hundred twenty (120) days
after a plan is submitted.
Sec. 4. The department shall notify a battery stewardship
organization in writing of a denial, including the reason for the
denial.
Sec. 5. If a battery stewardship organization intends to
materially change an approved plan, the battery stewardship
organization shall submit an amendment to the department for
approval. An amendment is subject to the same procedures
described in sections 3 and 4 of this chapter.
Sec. 6. An updated battery stewardship plan must be submitted
to the department every five (5) years after an initial plan is
approved by the department unless the battery stewardship
organization files a notice with the department of the
organization's intent to disband.
Sec. 7. The department shall impose the following fees:
(1) A review fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) the first
time a battery stewardship organization submits its plan to
the department for approval.
(2) An annual fee sufficient to cover the costs of the
department in administering this article, as determined by the
department, for each approved battery stewardship
organization.
Sec. 8. A person may not charge a fee to a consumer to defray
the costs of implementing a battery stewardship plan under this
chapter.
Sec. 9. (a) A battery stewardship organization that has:
(1) submitted an approved battery stewardship plan; and
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


(2) not filed a notice described in section 6 of this chapter;
shall submit an annual progress report to the department.
(b) The department shall provide standards for the contents of
progress reports described in subsection (a).
Chapter 4. Battery Stewardship Fund
Sec. 1. (a) The battery stewardship fund is established.
(b) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
the money in the fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(e) The sources of money for the fund are the following:
(1) Annual fees paid under IC 13-20.7-3-7.
(2) Appropriations made by the general assembly, gifts, and
donations intended for deposit in the fund.
(f) The commissioner shall use money in the fund to pay the
expenses of administering this article.
Chapter 5. Miscellaneous Provisions
Sec. 1. The department shall publish the following on the
department's website:
(1) A copy of each active battery stewardship plan approved
by the department under this article, including any
amendments.
(2) The name of each producer covered by a battery
stewardship plan approved by the department under this
article.
(3) The name of each brand of covered batteries covered by a
battery stewardship plan approved by the department under
this article.
(4) A copy of each annual progress report submitted to the
department under IC 13-20.7-3-9.
Sec. 2. (a) A battery stewardship organization:
(1) shall provide for the collection of loose covered batteries;
and
(2) may, but is not required to, provide for the collection of:
(A) battery containing products; or
(B) covered batteries or battery containing products
recalled for safety reasons.
(b) If a battery stewardship organization collects a covered
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


battery or battery containing product described in subsection
(a)(2)(B), the battery stewardship organization may recover all
costs incurred in collecting, transporting, and processing the
covered battery or battery containing product from the producer.
Sec. 3. (a) A person may operate a fee based collection and
recycling program that collects covered batteries independently of
a battery stewardship organization or a similar program that is not
fee based for government sites if the following conditions are met:
(1) The person accepts all covered batteries.
(2) The person receives no compensation from a battery
stewardship organization with respect to the covered
batteries, unless the battery stewardship organization has an
agreement with the person.
(3) The person provides the following information to the
department on an annual basis, as established by the
department, with respect to each covered battery collected by
the person:
(A) The weight, by chemistry, of covered batteries
collected.
(B) The weight of materials recovered from covered
batteries collected, in total and by method of battery
recycling.
(C) The percentage calculated by dividing:
(i) the weight of components and materials recycled by
the person; by
(ii) the weight of covered batteries collected by the
person;
for each recycling process.
(D) A description of how each facility used for the final
disposition of covered batteries, whether recycled or
otherwise, managed the batteries and battery components.
(E) The weight and chemistry of covered batteries sent to
each facility that is used for final disposition of the
batteries.
(b) If a battery stewardship organization's performance goals
would be impacted by the information provided under subsection
(a)(3), the department shall:
(1) consider the information when calculating the recycling
efficiency rate for the battery stewardship organization; and
(2) provide the information to the battery stewardship
organization.
Sec. 4. Beginning January 1, 2029, a person may not knowingly
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


cause or allow:
(1) the placing of a covered battery into a container intended
for collection and disposal at a facility that is not authorized
under IC 13-22 or federal law for operation as a hazardous
waste facility; or
(2) the disposal of a covered battery in a facility that is not
authorized under IC 13-22 or federal law for operation as a
hazardous waste facility.
Sec. 5. (a) A person that violates section 4 of this chapter is not
subject to:
(1) a criminal or civil action or penalty; or
(2) any other sanction;
under this title or any other state law.
(b) A violation of this chapter does not create a cause of action.
Sec. 6. A producer and battery stewardship organization are
exempt from the provisions of IC 24-1 with respect to planning,
reporting, or operating a battery stewardship program, including:
(1) the creation, implementation, or management of a battery
stewardship organization and any battery stewardship plan,
regardless of whether it is submitted, denied, or approved;
(2) the determination of the cost and structure of a battery
stewardship plan; and
(3) the types or quantities of batteries being recycled or
otherwise managed under this article.
Sec. 7. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 and
IC 13-14-9 to implement this article.
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Environmental Affairs, to which
was referred House Bill 1231, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 13-11-2-17.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17.3. (a) "Battery containing
product", for purposes of section 171.5 of this chapter and
IC 13-20.7, means a product that contains or is packaged with a
covered battery.
(b) The term does not include computers, small scale servers,
computer monitors, electronic keyboards and mice, printers, fax
machines, scanners, televisions, digital video disc players and
recorders, video cassette recorders, digital converter boxes, cable
receivers, satellite receivers, portable digital music players, and
video game consoles.".
Page 2, line 31, after "Sec. 171.5." insert "(a)".
Page 2, line 32, delete "a".
Page 2, delete line 33 and insert "the following:
(1) For a covered battery, the following:
(A) If the battery is sold under the brand of the battery
manufacturer, the battery manufacturer.
(B) If the battery is sold under a retail brand or under a
brand owned by a person other than the manufacturer, the
brand owner.
(C) If clauses (A) and (B) are inapplicable, the licensee of
a brand or trademark under which the battery is:
(i) used in a commercial enterprise;
(ii) sold;
(iii) offered for sale; or
(iv) distributed.
(2) For a battery containing product, the following:
(A) If the battery containing product is sold under the
brand of the product manufacturer, the product
manufacturer.
(B) If the battery containing product is sold under a retail
brand or under a brand owned by a person other than the
manufacturer, the brand owner.
(C) If clauses (A) and (B) are inapplicable, the licensee of
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


a brand or trademark under which the product is:
(i) used in a commercial enterprise;
(ii) sold;
(iii) offered for sale; or
(iv) distributed.
(b) The term does not include a person who would otherwise be
considered a producer under subsection (a)(2) if:
(1) the supplier of the battery used in the product has joined
a registered battery stewardship organization with respect to
the battery; and
(2) the supplier provides written certification of its
membership in the approved battery stewardship
organization to the person who would otherwise be considered
a producer under subsection (a)(2).".
Page 4, delete lines 21 through 30 and insert "apply to:
(1) a covered battery regulated by IC 13-20-16, except that
this article does apply to a covered battery:
(A) that:
(i) contains lead and sulfuric acid; and
(ii) has nominal voltage of at least six (6) volts; and
(B) that is used in a motorized toy;
(2) a covered battery contained within a device, as defined in
U.S.C. 321(h), that is not designed and marketed for sale or
resale principally to consumers for personal use;
(3) a covered battery that is:
(A) in a product; and
(B) not designed to be easily removable from the product;
(4) a covered battery that contains an electrolyte as a free
liquid;
(5) a covered battery designed to power a motor vehicle, in
whole or part, or a component of a motor vehicle;
(6) a covered battery or battery containing product or that
has been recalled for safety reasons; or
(7) a covered battery that is a part of a utility scale battery
energy storage system (as defined in IC 22-14-8-3).".
Page 4, line 33, after "covered battery" insert "or battery
containing product".
Page 5, line 2, after "covered battery" insert "or battery in a
battery containing product".
Page 5, line 20, delete "and producer".
Page 5, line 25, delete "standards;" and insert "standards, including
collection site safety training procedures related to covered battery
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


collection activities at collection sites, such as appropriate
protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires and response protocols in
the event of a spill or fire, and a protocol for safe management of
damaged batteries that are returned to collection sites;".
Page 5, line 29, delete "consumers." and insert "consumers and
that reimburses units of local government for collecting covered
batteries.".
Page 6, delete lines 5 through 9, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 7. The department shall impose the following fees:
(1) A review fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) the first
time a battery stewardship organization submits its plan to
the department for approval.
(2) An annual fee sufficient to cover the costs of the
department in administering this article, as determined by the
department, for each approved battery stewardship
organization.".
Page 7, delete lines 7 through 27, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 2. (a) A battery stewardship organization:
(1) shall provide for the collection of loose covered batteries;
and
(2) may, but is not required to, provide for the collection of:
(A) battery containing products; or
(B) covered batteries or battery containing products
recalled for safety reasons.
(b) If a battery stewardship organization collects a covered
battery or battery containing product described in subsection
(a)(2)(B), the battery stewardship organization may recover all
costs incurred in collecting, transporting, and processing the
covered battery or battery containing product from the producer.
Sec. 3. (a) A person may operate a fee based collection and
recycling program that collects covered batteries independently of
a battery stewardship organization or a similar program that is not
fee based for government sites if the following conditions are met:
(1) The person accepts all covered batteries.
(2) The person receives no compensation from a battery
stewardship organization with respect to the covered
batteries, unless the battery stewardship organization has an
agreement with the person.
(3) The person provides the following information to the
department on an annual basis, as established by the
department, with respect to each covered battery collected by
the person:
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


(A) The weight, by chemistry, of covered batteries
collected.
(B) The weight of materials recovered from covered
batteries collected, in total and by method of battery
recycling.
(C) The percentage calculated by dividing:
(i) the weight of components and materials recycled by
the person; by
(ii) the weight of covered batteries collected by the
person;
for each recycling process.
(D) A description of how each facility used for the final
disposition of covered batteries, whether recycled or
otherwise, managed the batteries and battery components.
(E) The weight and chemistry of covered batteries sent to
each facility that is used for final disposition of the
batteries.
(b) If a battery stewardship organization's performance goals
would be impacted by the information provided under subsection
(a)(3), the department shall:
(1) consider the information when calculating the recycling
efficiency rate for the battery stewardship organization; and
(2) provide the information to the battery stewardship
organization.".
Page 7, after line 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 6. A producer and battery stewardship organization are
exempt from the provisions of IC 24-1 with respect to planning,
reporting, or operating a battery stewardship program, including:
(1) the creation, implementation, or management of a battery
stewardship organization and any battery stewardship plan,
regardless of whether it is submitted, denied, or approved;
(2) the determination of the cost and structure of a battery
stewardship plan; and
(3) the types or quantities of batteries being recycled or
otherwise managed under this article.".
Page 8, line 1, delete "Sec. 6." and insert "Sec. 7.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1231 as introduced.)
BAIRD
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153


Committee Vote: yeas 11, nays 0.
HB 1231—LS 6858/DI 153